California statutes. Civil Code
Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1934, the hiring of accommodations from month to month in a nursing or convalescent home shall be terminated by the death of the patient by or for whom the hiring was made. The hirer or his heir, legatee, or personal representative shall not be liable for any rent due for such accommodations under the hiring agreement beyond that rent due for the date on which such patient died. No advance payment of rent made by the hirer shall be subject to the claim of, or retention by, the nursing or convalescent home and shall be returned to the heir, legatee, or personal representative no later
than two weeks after such patient has died. Any provision in the hiring agreement by which the hirer agrees to modify or waive any of his rights under this section shall be void as contrary to public policy.

The provisions of this section shall be applicable to all hiring agreements executed on or after January 1, 1979.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 628.)
-------------------------------------------

1935.

When the hiring of a thing is terminated before the time originally agreed upon, the hirer must pay the due proportion of the hire for such use as he has actually made of the thing, unless such use is merely nominal, and of no benefit to him.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1938.

(a) A commercial property owner or lessor shall state on every lease form or rental agreement executed on or after January 1, 2017, whether or not the subject premises have undergone inspection by a Certified Access Specialist (CASp).

(b) If the subject premises have undergone inspection by a CASp and, to the best of the commercial property owner’s or
lessor’s knowledge, there have been no modifications or alterations completed or commenced between the date of the inspection and the date of the lease or rental agreement that have impacted the subject premises’ compliance with construction-related accessibility standards, the commercial property owner or lessor shall provide, prior to execution of the lease or rental agreement, a copy of any report prepared by the CASp with an agreement from the prospective lessee or tenant that information in the report shall remain confidential, except as necessary for the tenant to complete repairs and corrections of violations of construction-related accessibility standards that the lessee or tenant agrees to make.

(c) Making any repairs or modifications necessary to correct violations of construction-related accessibility standards that are noted in a CASp report is presumed to be the responsibility of the commercial property owner or lessor, unless
otherwise mutually agreed upon by the commercial property owner or lessor and the lessee or tenant. The prospective lessee or tenant shall have the opportunity to review any CASp report prior to execution of the lease or rental agreement. If the report is not provided to the prospective lessee or tenant at least 48 hours prior to execution of the lease or rental agreement, the prospective lessee or tenant shall have the right to rescind the lease or rental agreement, based upon the information contained in the report, for 72 hours after execution of the agreement.

(d) If the subject premises have been issued an inspection report by a CASp, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 55.53, indicating that it meets applicable standards, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 55.52, the commercial property owner or lessor shall provide a copy of the current disability access inspection certificate and any
inspection report to the lessee or tenant not already provided pursuant to subdivision (b) within seven days of the date of the execution of the lease form or rental agreement.

(e) If the subject premises have not been issued a disability access inspection certificate, as described in subdivision (e) of Section 55.53, the commercial property owner or lessor shall state the following on the lease form or rental agreement:
“A Certified Access Specialist (CASp) can inspect the subject premises and determine whether the subject premises comply with all of the applicable construction-related accessibility standards under state law. Although state law does not require a CASp inspection of the subject premises, the commercial property owner or lessor may not prohibit the lessee or tenant from obtaining a CASp inspection of the subject premises for the occupancy or
potential occupancy of the lessee or tenant, if requested by the lessee or tenant. The parties shall mutually agree on the arrangements for the time and manner of the CASp inspection, the payment of the fee for the CASp inspection, and the cost of making any repairs necessary to correct violations of construction-related accessibility standards within the premises.”
(f) As used in this section, “commercial property” means property that is offered for rent or lease to persons operating, or intending to operate, a place of public accommodation as defined in Section 202 of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations, or a facility to which the general public is invited, at those premises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 37.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Rental Passenger Vehicle Transactions [1939.01. - 1939.39.]

1939.01.

For the purpose of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Rental company” means a person or entity in the business of renting passenger vehicles to the public.

(b) “Renter” means any person in a manner obligated under a contract for the lease or hire of a passenger vehicle from a rental company for a period of less than 30 days.

(c) “Additional mandatory charges” means any separately stated charges that the rental company requires the renter to pay to hire or lease the vehicle for the period of time to which the rental rate applies, which are imposed by a governmental entity and specifically relate to the operation of a rental vehicle
 business, including, but not limited to, a customer facility charge, airport concession fee, tourism commission assessment, vehicle license recovery fee, or other government-imposed taxes or fees.

(d) “Airport concession fee” means a charge collected by a rental company from a renter that is the renter’s proportionate share of the amount paid by the rental company to the owner or operator of an airport for the right or privilege of conducting a vehicle rental business on the airport’s premises.

(e) “Authorized driver” means all of the following:

(1) The renter.

(2) The renter’s spouse, if that person is a licensed driver and satisfies the rental company’s minimum age requirement.

(3) The
 renter’s employer or coworker, if the employer or coworker is engaged in business activity with the renter, is a licensed driver, and satisfies the rental company’s minimum age requirement.

(4) A person expressly listed by the rental company on that renter’s contract as an authorized driver.

(f) “Customer facility charge” means any fee, including an alternative fee, required by an airport to be collected by a rental company from a renter pursuant to Section 50474.21 of the Government Code.

(g) “Damage waiver” means a rental company’s agreement not to hold a renter liable for all or any portion of any damage or loss related to the rented vehicle, any loss of use of the rented vehicle, or any storage, impound, towing, or administrative charges.

(h) “Electronic surveillance technology” means a technological method or system used to observe, monitor, or collect information, including telematics, Global Positioning System (GPS), wireless technology, or location-based technologies. “Electronic surveillance technology” does not include event data recorders (EDR), sensing and diagnostic modules (SDM), or other systems that are used either:

(1) For the purpose of identifying, diagnosing, or monitoring functions related to the potential need to repair, service, or perform maintenance on the rental vehicle.

(2) As part of the vehicle’s airbag sensing and diagnostic system in order to capture safety systems-related data for retrieval after a crash has occurred or in the event that the collision sensors are activated to prepare the decisionmaking computer to make the determination to deploy or not to deploy the
 airbag.

(i) “Estimated time for replacement” means the number of hours of labor, or fraction thereof, needed to replace damaged vehicle parts as set forth in collision damage estimating guides generally used in the vehicle repair business and commonly known as “crash books.”

(j) “Estimated time for repair” means a good faith estimate of the reasonable number of hours of labor, or fraction thereof, needed to repair damaged vehicle parts.

(k) “Membership program” means a service offered by a rental company that permits customers to bypass the rental counter and go directly to the vehicle previously reserved or select an alternate vehicle. A membership program shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) The renter initiates enrollment by completing
 an application on which the renter can specify a preference for type of vehicle and acceptance or declination of optional services.

(2) The rental company fully discloses, prior to the enrollee’s first rental as a participant in the program, all terms and conditions of the rental agreement as well as all required disclosures.

(3) The renter may terminate enrollment at any time.

(4) The rental company fully explains to the renter that designated preferences, as well as acceptance or declination of optional services, may be changed by the renter at any time for the next and future rentals.

(5) An employee is available at the lot where the renter takes possession of the vehicle, to receive any change in the rental agreement from the renter.

(l) “Passenger vehicle” or “vehicle” means a “passenger vehicle” as defined in Section 465 of the Vehicle Code.

(m) “Personal vehicle sharing program” means a person or entity that for monetary compensation facilitates sharing or renting passenger vehicles to the public, including via a peer-to-peer internet website, application, or other platform that connects a vehicle owner with a vehicle driver to facilitate sharing or renting a vehicle for consideration, and includes a personal vehicle sharing program as defined in Section 11580.24 of the Insurance Code. 

(n) “Quote” means an estimated cost of rental provided by a rental company or a third party to a potential customer that is based on information provided by the potential customer and used to generate an estimated cost of rental, including, but not limited to,
 potential dates of rental, locations, or classes of vehicle.

(o) “Tourism commission assessment” means the charge collected by a rental company from a renter that has been established by the California Travel and Tourism Commission pursuant to Section 13995.65 of the Government Code.

(p) “Vehicle license fee” means the tax imposed pursuant to the Vehicle License Fee Law (Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code).

(q) “Vehicle registration fee” means any fee imposed pursuant to any provision of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 9101) of Division 3 of the Vehicle Code or any other law that imposes a fee upon the registration of vehicles in this state.

(r) “Vehicle license recovery fee” means a charge that
 seeks to recover the amount of any vehicle license fee and vehicle registration fee paid by a rental company for the particular class of vehicle being rented. If imposed, the vehicle license recovery fee shall be separately stated as a single charge in the quote and rental contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 547, Sec. 1.   (AB 893)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1939.03.

Except as limited by Section 1939.05, a rental company and a renter may agree that the renter will be responsible for no more than all of the following:

(a) Physical or mechanical damage to the rented vehicle up to its fair market value, as determined in the customary market for the sale of that vehicle, resulting from collision regardless of the cause of the damage.

(b) (1) Loss due to theft of the rented vehicle up to its fair market value, as determined in the customary market for the sale of that vehicle, provided that the rental company establishes by clear and convincing evidence that the renter or the authorized driver
 failed to exercise ordinary care while in possession of the vehicle. In addition, the renter shall be presumed to have no liability for any loss due to theft if both of the following conditions are met:

(A) An authorized driver returns the ignition key furnished by the rental company.

(B) An authorized driver files an official report of the theft with the police or other law enforcement agency within 24 hours of learning of the theft and reasonably cooperates with the rental company and the police or other law enforcement agency in providing information concerning the theft.

(2) The presumption set forth in this subdivision is a presumption affecting the burden of proof which the rental company may rebut by
 establishing that an authorized driver committed, or aided and abetted the commission of, the theft.

(c) Physical damage to the rented vehicle up to its fair market value, as determined in the customary market for the sale of that vehicle, resulting from vandalism occurring after, or in connection with, the theft of the rented vehicle. However, the renter shall have no liability for any damage due to vandalism if the renter would have no liability for theft pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) Physical damage to the rented vehicle up to a total of five hundred dollars ($500) resulting from vandalism unrelated to the theft of the rented vehicle.

(e) Actual charges for towing, storage, and impound fees paid by the rental company if the
 renter is liable for damage or loss.

(f) An administrative charge, which shall include the cost of appraisal and all other costs and expenses incident to the damage, loss, repair, or replacement of the rented vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 449, Sec. 1.   (AB 1197)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1939.05.

(a) The total amount of the renter’s liability to the rental company resulting from damage to the rented vehicle shall not exceed the sum of the following:

(1) The estimated cost of parts which the rental company would have to pay to replace damaged vehicle parts.

(2) The estimated cost of labor to replace damaged vehicle parts,
which shall not exceed the product of (A) the rate for labor usually paid by the rental company to replace vehicle parts of the type that were damaged and (B) the estimated time for replacement.

(3) The estimated cost of labor to repair damaged vehicle parts, which shall not exceed the lesser of the following:

(A) The product of the rate for labor usually paid by the rental company to repair vehicle parts of the type that were damaged and the estimated time for repair.

(B) The sum of the estimated labor and parts costs determined under paragraphs (1) and (2) to replace the same vehicle parts.

(4) Actual charges for towing, storage, and impound fees paid by the rental company.

(b) For
purposes of subdivision (a), all discounts and price reductions or adjustments that are or will be received by the rental company shall be subtracted from the estimate to the extent not already incorporated in the estimate, or otherwise promptly credited or refunded to the renter.

(c) For the purpose of converting the estimated time for repair into the same units of time in which the rental rate is expressed, a day shall be deemed to consist of eight hours.

(d) The administrative charge described in subdivision (f) of Section 1939.03 shall not exceed (1) fifty dollars ($50) if the total estimated cost for parts and labor is more than one hundred dollars ($100) up to and including five hundred dollars ($500), (2) one hundred dollars ($100) if the total estimated cost for parts and labor exceeds five hundred dollars ($500) up to and including one thousand five hundred dollars
($1,500), or (3) one hundred fifty dollars ($150) if the total estimated cost for parts and labor exceeds one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500). An administrative charge shall not be imposed if the total estimated cost of parts and labor is one hundred dollars ($100) or less.

(e) The total amount of an authorized driver’s liability to the rental company, if any, for damage occurring during the authorized driver’s operation of the rented vehicle shall not exceed the amount of the renter’s liability under this section.

(f) A rental company shall not recover from an authorized driver an amount exceeding the renter’s liability under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 183, Sec. 5.   (AB 2051)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1939.07.

(a) A claim against a renter resulting from damage or loss, excluding loss of use, to a rental vehicle shall be reasonably and rationally related to the actual loss incurred. A rental company shall mitigate damages where possible and shall not assert or collect a claim for physical damage which exceeds the actual costs of the repairs performed or the estimated cost of repairs, if the rental company chooses not to repair the vehicle, including all discounts and
price reductions. However, if the vehicle is a total loss vehicle, the claim shall not exceed the total loss vehicle value established in accordance with procedures that are customarily used by insurance companies when paying claims on total loss vehicles, less the proceeds from salvaging the vehicle, if those proceeds are retained by the rental company.

(b) If insurance coverage exists under the renter’s applicable personal or business insurance policy and the coverage is confirmed during regular business hours, the renter may require that the rental company submit any claims to the renter’s applicable personal or business insurance carrier. The rental company shall not make any written or oral representations that it will not present claims or negotiate with the renter’s insurance carrier. For purposes of this subdivision, confirmation of coverage includes telephone confirmation from insurance company representatives during regular business
hours. Upon request of the renter and after confirmation of coverage, the amount of claim shall be resolved between the insurance carrier and the rental company. The renter shall remain responsible for payment to the rental company for any loss sustained that the renter’s applicable personal or business insurance policy does not cover.

(c) A rental company shall not recover from an authorized driver for an item described in Section 1939.03 to the extent the rental company obtains recovery from another person.

(d) This chapter applies only to the maximum liability of an authorized driver to the rental company resulting from damage to the rented vehicle and not to the liability of another person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 183, Sec. 5.   (AB 2051)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1939.09.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a damage waiver shall provide or, if not expressly stated in writing, shall be deemed to provide that the renter has no liability for damage, loss, loss of use, or a cost or expense incident thereto.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (b), every limitation, exception, or exclusion to a damage waiver is void and unenforceable.

(b) A rental company may provide in the rental contract that a damage waiver does not apply under any of the following circumstances:

(1) Damage or loss results from an
 authorized driver’s (A) intentional, willful, wanton, or reckless conduct, (B) operation of the vehicle under the influence of drugs or alcohol in violation of Section 23152 of the Vehicle Code, (C) towing or pushing anything, or (D) operation of the vehicle on an unpaved road if the damage or loss is a direct result of the road or driving conditions.

(2) Damage or loss occurs while the vehicle is (A) used for commercial hire, (B) used in connection with conduct that could be properly charged as a felony, (C) involved in a speed test or contest or in driver training activity, (D) operated by a person other than an authorized driver, or (E) operated outside the United States.

(3) An authorized driver who has (A) provided fraudulent information to the rental company, or (B) provided
 false information and the rental company would not have rented the vehicle if it had instead received true information.

(c) (1) A rental company that offers or provides a damage waiver for any consideration in addition to the rental rate shall clearly and conspicuously disclose the following information in the rental contract or holder in which the contract is placed and, also, in signs posted at the location where the renter signs the rental contract, and, for renters who are enrolled in the rental company’s membership program, in a sign that shall be posted in a location clearly visible to those renters as they enter the location where their reserved rental vehicles are parked or near the exit of the bus or other conveyance that transports the enrollee to a reserved vehicle: (A) the nature of the renter’s liability,
 such as liability for all collision damage regardless of cause, (B) the extent of the renter’s liability, such as liability for damage or loss up to a specified amount, (C) the renter’s personal insurance policy or the credit card used to pay for the vehicle rental transaction may provide coverage for all or a portion of the renter’s potential liability, (D) the renter should consult with their insurer to determine the scope of insurance coverage, including the amount of the deductible, if any, for which the renter is obligated, (E) the renter may purchase an optional damage waiver to cover all liability, subject to whatever exceptions the rental company expressly lists that are permitted under subdivision (b), and (F) the range of charges for the damage waiver.

(2) In addition to the requirements of paragraph (1), a rental company
 that offers or provides a damage waiver shall orally disclose to all renters, except those who are participants in the rental company’s membership program, that the damage waiver may be duplicative of coverage that the customer maintains under their own policy of motor vehicle insurance. The renter shall acknowledge receipt of the oral disclosure near that part of the contract where the renter indicates, by the renter’s own initials, their acceptance or declination of the damage waiver. Adjacent to that same part, the contract also shall state that the damage waiver is optional. Further, the contract for these renters shall include a clear and conspicuous written disclosure that the damage waiver may be duplicative of coverage that the customer maintains under their own policy of motor vehicle insurance.

(3) (A) The following
 is an example, for purposes of illustration and not limitation, of a notice fulfilling the requirements of paragraph (1) for a rental company that imposes liability on the renter for collision damage to the full value of the vehicle:

“NOTICE ABOUT YOUR FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY AND OPTIONAL DAMAGE WAIVER

You are responsible for all collision damage to the rented vehicle even if someone else caused it or the cause is unknown. You are responsible for the cost of repair up to the value of the vehicle, and towing, storage, and impound fees.

Your own insurance, or the issuer of the credit card you use to pay for the vehicle rental transaction, may cover all or part of your financial responsibility for the rented vehicle. You should check with your insurance company, or credit card
 issuer, to find out about your coverage and the amount of the deductible, if any, for which you may be liable.

Further, if you use a credit card that provides coverage for your potential liability, you should check with the issuer to determine if you must first exhaust the coverage limits of your own insurance before the credit card coverage applies.

The rental company will not hold you responsible if you buy a damage waiver. But a damage waiver will not protect you if (list exceptions).”

(B) When the notice in subparagraph (A) is printed in the rental contract or holder in which the contract is placed, the following shall be printed immediately following the notice:

“The cost of an optional damage waiver is
 $____ for every (day or week).”

(C) When the notice in subparagraph (A) appears on a sign, the following shall appear immediately adjacent to the notice:

“The cost of an optional damage waiver is $____ to $____ for every (day or week), depending upon the vehicle rented.”

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, a rental company may sell a damage waiver for each full or partial 24-hour rental day for the damage
 waiver, subject to the following rate limitations:

(1) For rental vehicles that the rental company designates as an “economy car,” “compact car,” “intermediate car,” “standard car,” “full-size car,” or another term having similar meaning to the five smallest body-size categories of vehicles established by the Association of Car Rental Industry Systems Standards for North America when offered for rental, the rate shall not exceed twenty-five dollars ($25).

(2) Starting January 1, 2023, and each January thereafter, the rate cap shall be increased based on the increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) over the previous year as reported by the United States Bureau of Labor
 Statistics.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 415, Sec. 1.   (AB 901)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1939.13.

(a) A rental company shall not require the purchase of a damage waiver, optional insurance, or another optional good or service.

(b) A rental company shall not engage in any unfair, deceptive, or coercive conduct to induce a renter to purchase the damage waiver, optional insurance, or another optional good or service, including conduct such as, but not limited to, refusing to honor the renter’s
reservation, limiting the availability of vehicles, requiring a deposit, or debiting or blocking the renter’s credit card account for a sum equivalent to a deposit if the renter declines to purchase the damage waiver, optional insurance, or another optional good or service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 183, Sec. 5.   (AB 2051)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1939.15.

(a) In the absence of express permission granted by the renter subsequent to damage to, or loss of, the rented vehicle, a rental company shall not seek to recover any portion of a claim arising out of damage to, or loss of, the vehicle by processing a credit card charge or causing a debit or block to be placed on the renter’s credit card account.

(b) A rental company shall not engage in any
unfair, deceptive, or coercive tactics in attempting to recover or in recovering on any claim arising out of damage to, or loss of, the rented vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 183, Sec. 5.   (AB 2051)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1939.17.

A customer facility charge or alternative customer facility charge may be collected by a rental company pursuant to Section 50474.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 183, Sec. 5.   (AB 2051)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1939.19.

(a) When providing a quote, or imposing charges for a rental, the rental company or third party may separately state the rental rate, additional mandatory charges, if any, and a mileage charge, if any, that a renter must pay to hire or lease the vehicle for the period of time to which the rental rate applies. A rental company or third party shall not charge in addition to the rental rate, additional mandatory charges including mandatory third party service fees, or a mileage charge, as those may be applicable, any other fee that is required to be paid by the renter as a condition of hiring or leasing the vehicle. The rental company or third party shall provide the total charges estimate for the entire rental, including all taxes and fees imposed by a government, as soon as dates, location, and vehicle type or class, which can
 include all vehicles, for the rental are provided to the rental company or third party.

(b) (1) If additional mandatory charges are imposed, the rental company shall do all of the following:

(A) At the time the quote is given, provide the person receiving the quote with the total charges estimate of the rental rate and all additional mandatory charges for the entire rental. The total charges, if provided on an internet website page, shall be displayed in a typeface at least as large as any rental rate disclosed on that page and shall be provided on a page that the person receiving the quote may reach by following a link directly from the page on which the rental rate is first provided. The total charges estimate may exclude mileage charges and charges for optional items that cannot be determined prior to completing the reservation based upon the information
 provided by the person.

(B) At the time and place the rental commences, clearly and conspicuously disclose in the rental contract, or that portion of the contract that is provided to the renter, the total of the rental rate and additional mandatory charges, for the entire rental, exclusive of charges that cannot be determined at the time the rental commences. Charges imposed pursuant to this paragraph shall be no more than the amount of the quote provided in a confirmed reservation, unless the person changes the terms of the rental contract subsequent to making the reservation.

(C) Provide each person, other than those persons within the rental company, offering quotes to actual or prospective customers, access to information about additional mandatory charges, as well as access to information about when those charges apply. Any person providing quotes to actual or prospective
 customers for the hire or lease of a vehicle from a rental company shall provide the quotes in the manner described in subparagraph (A).

(2) If additional mandatory charges are imposed, a third party shall do both of the following:

(A) At the time the quote is given, provide the person receiving the quote with the total charges estimate of the rental rate and all additional mandatory charges for the entire rental. The total charges, if provided on an internet website page, shall be displayed in a typeface at least as large as any rental rate disclosed on that page and shall be provided on a page that the person receiving the quote may reach by following a link directly from the page on which the rental rate is first provided. The total charges estimate may exclude mileage charges and charges for optional items that cannot be determined prior to completing the reservation based
 upon the information provided by the person.

(B) Provide each person, other than those persons within the third party, offering quotes to actual or prospective customers, access to information about additional mandatory charges, as well as access to information about when those charges apply. Any person providing quotes to actual or prospective customers for the hire or lease of a vehicle from a third party shall provide the quotes in the manner described in subparagraph (A).

(c) In addition to the rental rate, taxes, additional mandatory charges, if any, and mileage charges, if any, a rental company or third party may charge for an item or service provided in connection with a particular rental transaction if the renter could have avoided incurring the charge by choosing not to obtain or utilize the optional item or service. Items and services for which the rental company or
 third party may impose an additional charge include, but are not limited to, optional insurance and accessories requested by the renter, service charges incident to the renter’s optional return of the vehicle to a location other than the location where the vehicle was hired or leased, and charges for refueling the vehicle at the conclusion of the rental transaction in the event the renter did not return the vehicle with as much fuel as was in the fuel tank at the beginning of the rental. A rental company also may impose an additional charge based on reasonable age criteria established by the rental company.

(d) A rental company or third party may charge a fee for an authorized driver, in addition to the rental charge for an individual renter, unless the authorized driver is either of the following:

(1) The renter’s spouse, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of
 Section 1939.01, the renter’s child or person for whom the renter is a legal guardian, the renter’s sibling, or the renter’s parent or grandparent.

(2) The renter’s employer or coworker, as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 1939.01.

(e) In the event that a rental company or third party learns that an additional driver who was not previously authorized in the rental agreement has driven the rental car, the rental company or third party may charge up to twice the authorized driver fee.

(f) If a rental company or third party states a rental rate in print advertisement or in a quotation, the rental company or third party shall disclose clearly in that advertisement or quotation the terms of mileage conditions relating to the advertised or quoted rental rate, including, but not limited to, to the
 extent applicable, the amount of mileage and gas charges, the number of miles for which no charges will be imposed, and a description of geographic driving limitations within the United States and Canada.

(g) All rate advertisements, including those by third parties, shall include a disclaimer, which shall be prominently displayed, providing that additional mandatory charges may be imposed, including, but not limited to, airport fees, tourism fees, vehicle license recovery fees, or other government imposed taxes or fees, and indicating that this information, including an estimate of the total rental cost, is displayed on the rental company’s or third party’s internet website. All rate advertisements shall also include a statement that additional charges may apply if an optional good or service, such as a damage waiver, is purchased. 

(h) If a rental company provides a third party
 with rental rate, additional mandatory charges information, and fuel source information, the rental company is not responsible for the failure of that third party to comply with this section. If a rental company provides a third party with rental rate, additional mandatory charges information, and fuel source information in a manner that does not comply with this section or the rental company fails to provide the third party with additional mandatory charges information and fuel source information along with the rental rate information, the third party is not responsible for the failure of the rental company to comply with this section.

(i) If a rental company delivers a vehicle to a renter at a location other than the location where the rental company normally carries on its business, the rental company shall not charge the renter an amount for the rental for the period before the delivery of the vehicle. If a rental company picks up a rented
 vehicle from a renter at a location other than the location where the rental company normally carries on its business, the rental company shall not charge the renter an amount for the rental for the period after the renter notifies the rental company to pick up the vehicle.

(j) Except as otherwise permitted pursuant to the customer facility charge, a rental company shall not separately charge, in addition to the rental rate, a fee for transporting the renter to a location where the rented vehicle will be delivered to the renter.

(k) A rental company or third party shall clearly indicate the fuel source of the vehicle prior to completion of a reservation. For purposes of this subdivision, “fuel source” has the same definition as the term “engine fuel” in Section 13400 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 349, Sec. 1.   (AB 1374)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1939.20.

(a) A rental company is not in violation of paragraph (29) of subdivision (a) of Section 1770 for excluding from the advertised, displayed, or offered price of a rental vehicle charges that are disclosed to the consumer in compliance with subdivisions (a), (b), and (g) of Section 1939.19.

(b) This section shall become operative on July
 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 400, Sec. 4.   (SB 478)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1939.21.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Additional charges” means charges other than a per period base rental rate established by the business program.

(2) “Business program” means either of the following:

(A) A contract between a rental company and a business program
sponsor that has established the per period base rental rate, and any other material terms relating to additional charges, on which the rental company will rent passenger vehicles to persons authorized by the sponsor.

(B) A plan, program, or other arrangement established by a rental company at the request of, or with the consent of, a business program sponsor under which the rental company offers to rent passenger vehicles to persons authorized by the sponsor at per period base rental rates, and any other material terms relating to additional charges, that are not the same as those generally offered by the rental company to the public.

(3) “Business program sponsor” means a legal entity, other than a natural person, that is a corporation, limited liability company, or partnership.

(4) “Business renter” means, for any
business program sponsor, a person who is authorized by the sponsor, through the use of an identifying number or program name or code, to enter into a rental contract under the sponsor’s business program. In no case shall the term “business renter” include a person renting as any of the following:

(A) A nonemployee member of a not-for-profit organization.

(B) The purchaser of a voucher or other prepaid rental arrangement from a person, including a tour operator, engaged in the business of reselling those vouchers or prepaid rental arrangements to the general public.

(C) An individual whose vehicle rental is eligible for reimbursement in whole or in part as a result of the person being insured or provided coverage under a policy of insurance issued by an insurance company.

(D) An individual whose vehicle rental is eligible for reimbursement in whole or in part as a result of the person purchasing passenger vehicle repair services from a person licensed to perform such services.
